District of Columbia statutes.
47-893

Levy of special assessment; protest; termination of levy.

(a)

Beginning in tax year 2008, there is levied a special assessment upon each real property located within the Southeast Water and Sewer Improvement Benefit District, except the following:

(1)

Real properties owned by the District of Columbia, except an independent instrumentality or authority of the District of Columbia, the United States, or the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority; provided, that if an interest in or use of the land of such real property is subject to taxation under § 47-1005.01 because of a ground lease and the improvement is privately owned, the interest in or use of the land and the improvement shall be subject to the special assessment imposed by this subchapter based on the land area of the interest and the actual gross building area of the improvement (if not subject to District zoning) or the gross building area of the improvement (if subject to District zoning); provided further, that if the real property becomes owned by an entity other than the District of Columbia, the United States, or the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority, the provisions of this paragraph shall not exempt the real property from the special assessment imposed by this subchapter;

(2)

Real properties on which, on June 1, 2007, occupied residential were located; provided, that after June 1, 2007, if the real property is redeveloped for nonresidential uses, or if the real property becomes part of a development project that may include a condominium regime, that consists of 5 or more dwelling units, the provisions of this paragraph shall not exempt the real property or subdivisions thereof from the special assessment imposed by this subchapter;

(3)

Real properties on which, on June 1, 2007, an active house of worship with a tax-exempt status was located; provided, that after June 1, 2007, if the real property is later used for a purpose other than as a house of worship, the provisions of this paragraph shall not exempt the real property from the special assessment imposed by this subchapter; or

(4)

Real properties that received a certificate of occupancy for a building of over 10,000 square feet between January 1, 2003, and June 1, 2007, or which had a utility plan related to a building permit approved by the District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority between January 1, 2006, and October 31, 2006.

(b)

The special assessment applicable to a real property shall be equal to the sum of:

(1)

The storm drainage assessment factor of 0.118 multiplied by the land area of the real property or interest therein; and

(2)

The water and sewer assessment factor of 0.0346 multiplied by the gross building area of the real property.

(c)

(1)

Within 180 days after the effective date of this subchapter, for tax year 2008, the Chief Financial Officer shall determine each real property that is subject to the special assessment under this subchapter and give notice of the special assessment to the owner, as shown on the real property tax records of the District. The notice shall state the amount of the proposed special assessment and the procedure for appeal set forth in subsection (e) of this section. The Chief Financial Officer shall not recalculate either factor because an additional real property has become subject to the special assessment after the first determination under this paragraph. No further notice shall be required for future tax years.

(2)

If a real property becomes subject to the special assessment imposed by this subchapter after [January 29, 2008], the Chief Financial Officer shall give notice of the special assessment to the owner, as shown on the real property tax records of the District, of such real property within 90 days after the Chief Financial Officer determines the real property has become subject to the special assessment. The notice shall state the amount of the proposed special assessment and the procedure for appeal set forth in subsection (e) of this section. The real property shall become liable for the special assessment as of the beginning of the next succeeding tax year from the date on which such real property became subject to the special assessment. No further notice shall be required for future tax years.

(3)

The owner of a real property may elect at least once annually and upon the sale of a real property, under procedures established by the Chief Financial Officer, to pay in a lump sum payment equal to the present value, calculated as of the next succeeding June 30th at an annual discount rate of 4.5%, of the total amount of all future annual special assessments to which the Chief Financial Officer determines the real property is subject under this subchapter. If the owner makes such a lump sum payment within 30 days from the date of the special assessment bill from the Chief Financial Officer, the real property shall not be subject to future annual special assessments under this subchapter.

(d)

If the Chief Financial Officer learns that a real property subject to the special assessment has been omitted from the special assessment for any previous tax year, the Chief Financial Officer shall provide notice under subsection (e) of this section to the owner for the succeeding, current, and prior tax years, and shall collect the special assessment amount in arrears, including penalty and interest from the date the special assessment should have been paid; provided, that no real property that has escaped the special assessment shall be liable under this section for a period of more than 3 prior tax years. No further notice shall be required for future tax years.

(e)

The owner of a real property subject to special assessment under this subchapter, when first provided notice of a special assessment under this subchapter, may petition for administrative review, and appeal from a final determination made upon administrative review, of the amount of a special assessment, or the imposition of the special assessment, on the real property or interest therein in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in § 47-825.01(f-1) as if the owner were a new property owner; provided, that for purposes of the new owner appeal, the date of transfer shall be deemed to be the date of the notice and the tax year shall be deemed to be the last tax year included in the notice; provided further, that notwithstanding the foregoing, the notice under subsection (c)(1) of this section shall be mailed on or before March 1, 2008 and the owner may petition for an administrative review on or before April 1, 2008 and appeal therefrom to the same extent and under the same conditions as a real property owner may appeal his tax year 2009 real property tax assessment.

(f)

Beginning in tax year 2008, special assessments under this subchapter shall be levied annually and shall be due on June 30 of the tax year. The owner shall have 30 days to pay the special assessment bill before the bill is due.

(g)

(1)

Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an unpaid special assessment shall be subject to the same penalty and interest provisions as a delinquent real property tax under this chapter. A lien for an unpaid special assessment, including penalty and interest, shall attach to the real property in the same manner as, and with a priority immediately junior to, a lien for delinquent real property tax under Chapter 13A [of this title]. The unpaid special assessment shall be collected in the same manner and under the same conditions and subject to the same penalty as for unpaid real property taxes.

(2)

If an interest in, or use of the land of, a real property is subject to the special assessment because it is subject to taxation under § 47-1005.01, an unpaid special assessment on such interest or use shall be subject to the same penalty and interest provisions as a delinquent tax imposed under § 47-1005.01, and the unpaid special assessment shall be collected in the same manner and under the same conditions and subject to the same penalty as for an unpaid tax imposed under § 47-1005.01.

(h)

The levy of special assessments under this subchapter shall terminate on the date on which the special assessment total collection amount has been received by the District, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer.

(i)

A special assessment imposed under this subchapter shall not be required to be certified for the purposes of Chapter 13A of this title.

(j)

Each special assessment shall be made part of the public record.

(k)

The total collection amount from the Southeast Water and Sewer Improvement Benefit District shall not exceed the amount required to pay the debt service on a total amount of $12.45 million of borrowing authority, which shall represent the special assessment total collection amount of the properties subject to the assessment under this subchapter.

Jan. 29, 2007, D.C. Law 17-89, § 2(b), 54 DCR 11919
July 13, 2012, D.C. Law 19-155, § 2(e), 59 DCR 5590
This section is referenced in § 47-891 and § 47-894.
D.C. Law 19-155 rewrote subsec. (e), which formerly read:
“(e) The owner of a real property subject to special assessment under this subchapter, when first provided notice of a special assessment under this subchapter, may petition for administrative review, and appeal from a final determination made upon administrative review, of the amount of a special assessment, or the imposition of the special assessment, on the real property or interest therein in the same manner and to the same extent as set forth in § 47-825.01(f-1) as if the owner were a new property owner; provided, that for purposes of the new owner appeal, the date of transfer shall be deemed to be the date of the notice and the tax year shall be deemed to be the last tax year included in the notice; provided further, that notwithstanding the foregoing, the notice under subsection (c)(1) of this section shall be mailed on or before March 1, 2008 and the owner may petition for an administrative review on or before April 1, 2008 and appeal therefrom to the same extent and under the same conditions as a real property owner may appeal his tax year 2009 real property tax assessment.”